Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXIV Public Utilities
Penalties

278.990.
Penalties.

Any officer, agent, or employee of a utility, as defined in KRS

278.010

, and any other person who willfully violates any of the provisions of this chapter or any regulation promulgated pursuant to this chapter, or fails to obey any order of the commission from which all rights of appeal have been exhausted, or who procures, aids, or abets a violation by any utility, shall be subject to either a civil penalty to be assessed by the commission not to exceed two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) for each offense or a criminal penalty of imprisonment for not more than six (6) months, or both. If any utility willfully violates any of the provisions of this chapter or any regulation promulgated pursuant to this chapter, or does any act therein prohibited, or fails to perform any duty imposed upon it under those sections for which no penalty has been provided by law, or fails to obey any order of the commission from which all rights of appeal have been exhausted, the utility shall be subject to a civil penalty to be assessed by the commission for each offense not less than twenty-five dollars ($25) nor more than two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500). Each act, omission, or failure by an officer, agent, or other person acting for or employed by a utility and acting within the scope of his employment shall be deemed to be the act, omission, or failure of the utility.

Actions to recover the principal amount due and penalties under this chapter shall be brought in the name of the Commonwealth in the Franklin Circuit Court. Whenever any utility is subject to a penalty under this chapter, the commission shall certify the facts to its counsel, who shall bring an action for recovery of the principal amount due and the penalty. The commission may compromise and dismiss the action on terms approved by the court. The principal amount due shall be paid into the State Treasury and credited to the account of the commission, and all penalties recovered in such actions shall be paid into the State Treasury and credited to the general fund.

Any utility that fails to pay an assessment as provided for by KRS

278.130

to

278.150

shall forfeit and pay to the state one thousand dollars ($1,000), and twenty-five dollars ($25) for each day it fails to pay the assessment, and shall not be released thereby from its liability for the assessment.

Any utility that issues any securities or evidences of indebtedness, or assumes any obligation or liability in respect to the securities or evidences of indebtedness of any other person, or makes any sale or other disposition of securities or evidences of indebtedness, or the proceeds thereof, for purposes other than the purposes specified in the order of the commission made with respect thereto under KRS

278.300

, shall be fined not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000).

Any utility that violates any of the provisions of KRS

278.460

shall be fined not less than one hundred dollars ($100) for each offense.

Any company that willfully fails to receive, transport, and deliver oil or gas as required by KRS

278.490

shall, in addition to being liable in damages to the injured person, be fined not less than one hundred dollars ($100) nor more than five hundred dollars ($500), and each day of willful failure shall constitute a separate offense.

Any telephone company that refuses to make a connection with the exchange or lines of another company for a period of thirty (30) days after being ordered to do so by the commission under subsection (2) of KRS

278.530

shall be fined not less than one thousand dollars ($1,000) nor more than five thousand dollars ($5,000), to be recovered by indictment in the Franklin Circuit Court or in the Circuit Court of the county where the company requesting the connection resides or has its chief office in this state. If the company desiring the connection proceeds to make the connection, as permitted by subsection (2) of KRS

278.530

, and the company so connected with refuses to receive and transmit the toll messages offered to it by the company making the connection, or refuses to deliver messages from its own lines or exchanges to the lines or exchanges of the company making the connection, the company so refusing shall be fined one hundred dollars ($100) for each day it refuses, to be recovered by indictment in the courts mentioned in the first sentence of this subsection; if it continues so to refuse for a period of six (6) months it shall forfeit its right to do business in this state, and any of its officers, agents, or employees who does or attempts to do any business in this state for it after the expiration of the six (6) months’ period shall be fined fifty dollars ($50) for each day he does or attempts to do such business.

History.

786, 842b-2, 2223-2, 3766b-1e, 3952-24, 3952-59, 3952-61, 4679f, 4679f-4: amend. Acts 1974, ch. 308, § 47; 1978, ch. 379, § 54, effective April 1, 1979; 1982, ch. 82, § 50, effective July 15, 1982; 1986, ch. 300, § 4, effective July 15, 1986; 1990, ch. 354, § 1, effective July 13, 1990.

278.992.
Penalty for certain pipeline violations.

Any person who violates any minimum safety standard adopted by the United States Department of Transportation pursuant to the federal pipeline safety laws, 49

U.S.C. secs. 60101

et seq., as amended, or any regulation adopted and filed pursuant to KRS Chapter 13A by the Public Service Commission governing the safety of pipeline facilities or the transportation of gas as those terms are defined in the Natural Gas Pipeline Safety Act, shall be subject to a civil penalty to be assessed by the Public Service Commission not to exceed the maximum civil penalty as contained in 49 C.F.R. sec. 190.223, as amended, for a violation of any provision of 49

U.S.C. secs. 60101

et seq., or any regulation or order issued thereunder, for each violation for each day that the violation persists. Any civil penalty assessed for a violation may be compromised by the commission. In determining the amount of the penalty, or the amount agreed upon in compromise, the appropriateness of the penalty to the size of the business of the person charged, the gravity of the violation, and the good faith of the person charged in attempting to achieve compliance, after notification of the violation, shall be considered. The amount of the penalty, when finally determined, or the amount agreed upon in compromise, may be deducted from any sums owing by the Commonwealth of Kentucky to the person charged or may be recovered in a civil action in the Franklin Circuit Court.

Any person who willfully and knowingly defaces, damages, removes, or destroys any pipeline sign or right-of-way marker required by the Natural Gas Pipeline Safety Act or any regulation or order issued pursuant to it shall, upon conviction, be subject for each offense to a fine of not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000), imprisonment for a term not to exceed one (1) year, or both.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1970, ch. 289, § 1; 1978, ch. 379, § 55, effective April 1, 1979; 1982, ch. 82, § 51, effective July 15, 1982; 1990, ch. 402, § 1, effective July 13, 1990; 1998, ch. 387, § 1, effective July 15, 1998; 2012, ch. 5, § 1, effective July 12, 2012; 2018 ch. 70, § 1, effective July 14, 2018.